Utah statutes.
19-2-109.3.   Public access to information.
A copy of each permit application, compliance plan, emissions or compliance
monitoring report, certification, and each operating permit issued under this
chapter shall be made available to the public in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
